Hawaii, session 2025, GM1281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 121-39, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§121-39 Pay of officers and warrant officers while on
active duty. Officers and warrant officers of the army or air
national guard while on active duty in the service of the State
shall receive the pay and allowances of officers and warrant
officers of similar grades of the United States Army and Air
Force, respectively; provided that:
(1) The State shall allow officers and warrant officers to
directly deposit their pay by electronic means to
their personal banking accounts;
(2) If an officer or warrant officer is activated for more
than thirty days in the service of the State and is
not otherwise covered by health insurance, the State
shall provide an allowance for the payment of TRICARE
reserve select, TRICARE dental, and vision coverage
for the individual officer or warrant officer and
2025-2761 SB88 CDl SMA.docx
ll■lllnlliilill■lllH^

Page 2 88
S.B. NO
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
TRICARE reserve select coverage for the officer's
family should the officer or warrant officer have
eligible dependents [-;—provided that thio paragraph
ohall only apply to officoro in the gradoo of-Q-3 and
bolQw- and warrant officoro in thc-gradeo of CW-2 and
feeiew]; and
(3) No pay or allowances shall be made to officers or
warrant officers for any service for which they
receive military pay and allowances from the United
States."
SECTION 2. Section 121-40, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows;
"§121-40 Pay of enlisted personnel while on active duty.
Enlisted personnel of the army and air national guard while on
active duty in the service of the State, except during periods
of annual field training or year-round field training, shall
receive the same pay and allowances as enlisted personnel of
similar rank in the United States Army and Air Force
respectively; provided that the:
2025-2761 SB88 CDl SMA.docx
lilMmilMIIIHim

Page 3
S.B. NO.
^.1
(1) State shall allow enlisted personnel to directly
deposit their pay by electronic means to their
personal banking accounts;
(2) If an enlisted person is activated for more than
thirty days in the service of the State and is not
otherwise covered by health insurance, the State shall
provide an allowance for the payment of TRICARE
reserve select, TRICARE dental, and vision coverage
for the individual enlisted person and TRICARE reserve
select coverage for the enlisted person's family
should the enlisted person have eligible dependents [-t
provided-that thio paragraph- shall only apply to
ettiir&feed—per&eRHelr—in—the—grades—©f—B—6—aftd-^eiew] ;
and
(3) Aggregate of the pay and allowances, computed on a
daily basis, shall in no event be less than the amount
equal to ten times the hourly wage specified in
section 387-2."
SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
2025-2761 SB88 CDl SMA.docx
ffliiniiiiiHiiiiBm

Page 4
S-B. NO.
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2761 SB88 CDl SMA.docx

S.B. NO.
APPROVED this 6th day of June .2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B.No. 88,H.D. 1,C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW AFI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 88, HD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives